Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.760

Loan program for mathematics and science teachers—Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 28B.15.762 and 28B.15.764.

(1) "Borrower" means an eligible student who has received a loan under RCW 28B.15.762.

(2) "Council" means the student achievement council.

(3) "Eligible student" means a student registered for at least ten credit hours or the equivalent and demonstrates achievement of a 3.00 grade point average for each academic year, who is a resident student as defined by RCW 28B.15.012 through 28B.15.015, who is a student who demonstrates financial need as defined in RCW 28B.92.030, and who has a declared major in a program leading to a degree in teacher education in a field of science or mathematics, or a certificated teacher who meets the same credit hour and financial eligibility requirements and is seeking an additional degree in science or mathematics.

(4) "Forgiven" or "to forgive" means to collect service as a teacher in a field of science or mathematics at a public school in the state of Washington in lieu of monetary payment.

(5) "Institution of higher education" or "institution" means a college or university in the state of Washington which is a member institution of an accrediting association recognized as such by rule of the council.

(6) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance.

(7) "Public school" means a middle school, junior high school, or high school within the public school system referred to in Article IX of the state Constitution.

(8) "Satisfied" means paid-in-full.

[ 2019 c 406 s 31; 2012 c 229 s 528. Prior: 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 155; 2004 c 275 s 65; 1985 c 370 s 79; 1983 1st ex.s. c 74 s 1.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.79.195.

Findings—Short title—2019 c 406: See notes following RCW 28B.92.200.

Findings—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28B.94.020.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28C.30.050.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.216.135.

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.

Severability—1983 1st ex.s. c 74: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1983 1st ex.s. c 74 s 6.]